Washington statutes.
RCW 8.16.070

Trial—View by jury.

A judge of the superior court shall preside at the trial and witnesses may be examined in behalf of either party to the proceedings, as in other civil actions, and upon the request of all the parties interested in such proceedings the court shall cause the jury impaneled to hear the same, to view the premises sought to be taken, and upon the request of any less number of the persons interested in the proceedings, the court may cause the jury to view the premises, pending the hearing of the case.

[ 1909 p 374 s 7; 1903 c 111 s 7; RRS s 912.]

NOTES:

Trial, civil actions, view by jury: RCW 4.44.270.